bg-BG: Модулни елементи на комплект за писта за топчета: Камбанка/звънче; Мост/надлез; Купол/колектор; Светещ/LED светлинен модул; Скок/рампа; Изстрелвачка/катапулт; Лупинг; Магнитни елементи; Ръчен асансьор/подемник; Моторизиран асансьор/подемник; Люлка-везна/накланящ се елемент; Звуков модул; Въртящо се колело/ротор; Спирална фуния/вихър; Стълби/стъпаловидна писта; Превключвател/отклонител за писта; Таймер/финална врата; Тунел; Друго
nl: Knikkerbaanset functiemodules: Bel/gong; Brug/viaduct; Koepel/verzamelaar; Glow-/led-lichtmodule; Sprong/schans; Schieter/katapult; Looping; Magnetische elementen; Handmatige lift; Gemotoriseerde lift; Wipwap/kantelaar; Geluidsmodule; Draaiend wiel/rotor; Spiraaltrechter/vortex; Trap/traject met treden; Wissel/baanomlegger; Timer/finishpoort; Tunnel; Anders
cs: Funkční moduly kuličkové skluzavky: Zvonek/zvonkohra; Most/nadjezd; Kopule/sběrač; Svítící / LED modul; Skok/rampa; Vystřelovač/katapult; Loping; Magnetické prvky; Manuální výtah; Motorizovaný výtah; Houpačka/překlápěč; Zvukový modul; Otočné kolo / rotor; Spirálovitý trychtýř / vír; Schody / stupňovitá dráha; Výhybka; Časovač / cílová brána; Tunel; Jiné
sl-SI: Funkcionalni moduli kompleta steze za frnikole: Zvonec/zvončki; Most/nadvoz; Kupola/zbiralnik; Svetleč/LED svetlobni modul; Skok/rampa; Izstreljevalnik/katapult; Zanka; Magnetni elementi; Ročno dvigalo/dvigalka; Motorizirano dvigalo/dvigalka; Gugalnica/nagibnik; Zvočni modul; Vrtljivo kolesce/rotor; Spiralni lijak/vrtinec; Stopnice/stopenjska proga; Kretnica/preusmerjevalnik proge; Časovnik/ciljna vrata; Predor; Drugo
fr: Modules fonctionnels du circuit à billes: Clochette / carillon; Pont / passerelle; Dôme / collecteur; Module lumineux / LED; Saut / rampe; Lanceur / catapulte; Looping; Éléments magnétiques; Ascenseur / élévateur manuel; Ascenseur / élévateur motorisé; Bascule; Module sonore; Roue qui tourne / rotor; Entonnoir en spirale / vortex; Escalier / piste à marches; Aiguillage / déviateur de piste; Chronomètre / porte d’arrivée; Tunnel; Autre
es: Módulos funcionales del set de pista de canicas: Campana/carillón; Puente/paso elevado; Cúpula/colector; Módulo de luz LED/brillante; Salto/rampa; Lanzador/catapulta; Rizo; Elementos magnéticos; Ascensor/elevador manual; Ascensor/elevador motorizado; Balancín/inclinador; Módulo de sonido; Rueda giratoria/rotor; Embudo en espiral/vórtice; Escaleras/pista de escalones; Cambio/desviador de pista; Temporizador/puerta de meta; Túnel; Otro
vi: Bộ đường ray bi có các mô-đun đặc trưng: Chuông/khánh; Cầu/cầu vượt; Mái vòm/bộ thu thập; Mô-đun phát sáng/đèn LED; Bậc nhảy/dốc; Bệ phóng/máy phóng; Vòng lặp; Các chi tiết nam châm; Thang máy/thang nâng thủ công; Thang máy/thang nâng có động cơ; Bập bênh/thiết bị nghiêng; Mô-đun âm thanh; Bánh xe quay/cánh quạt; Phễu xoắn ốc/vòng xoáy; Cầu thang/đường ray bậc thang; Công tắc/thiết bị chuyển hướng đường ray; Bộ đếm thời gian/cổng đích; Đường hầm; Khác
th: โมดูลคุณลักษณะชุดติดตามลูกแก้ว: กระดิ่ง/ระฆัง; สะพาน/ทางข้าม; โดม/ตัวเก็บลูกแก้ว; โมดูลเรืองแสง/ไฟ LED; ที่กระโดด/ทางลาด; แท่นปล่อย/เครื่องเหวี่ยง; ตีลังกา; ส่วนประกอบแม่เหล็ก; ลิฟต์หมุนมือ; ลิฟต์มอเตอร์; ไม้กระดก/ตัวเอียง; โมดูลเสียง; กังหันหมุน/โรเตอร์; กรวยเกลียว/น้ำวน; บันได/ทางลาดขั้นบันได; สวิตช์/ตัวสลับราง; นาฬิกาจับเวลา/เส้นชัย; อุโมงค์; อื่นๆ
ru: Функциональные модули набора мраморной трассы: Колокольчик/звонок; Мост/эстакада; Купол/коллектор; Светящийся / светодиодный модуль; Трамплин/рампа; Пускатель/катапульта; Мертвая петля; Магнитные элементы; Ручной подъемник/лифт; Моторизованный подъемник/лифт; Качели/балансир; Звуковой модуль; Вращающееся колесо / ротор; Спиральная воронка / водоворот; Лестница / ступенчатая дорожка; Переключатель / разветвитель дорожек; Таймер / финишные ворота; Туннель; Другое
de: Funktionsmodule des Murmelbahnsets: Glocke/Gong; Brücke/Überführung; Kuppel/Sammler; Leucht-/LED-Lichtmodul; Sprungschanze/Rampe; Abschussrampe/Katapult; Looping; Magnetische Elemente; Manueller Aufzug/Lift; Motorisierter Aufzug/Lift; Wippe/Kippelement; Soundmodul; Drehrad/Rotor; Spiraltriichter/Wirbel; Treppe/Stufenschiene; Weiche/Spurwechsler; Timer/Zieldurchfahrt; Tunnel; Sonstige
tr: Bilye parkuru seti özellik modülleri: Zil/çan; Köprü/üst geçit; Kubbe/toplayıcı; Işıltı/LED ışık modülü; Atlama/rampa; Fırlatıcı/mancınık; Tam tur çember; Manyetik öğeler; Manuel asansör/kaldıraç; Motorlu asansör/kaldıraç; Tahterevalli/eğici; Ses modülü; Dönen tekerlek/rotor; Sarmal huni/girdap; Merdivenler/basamaklı ray; Makas/ray saptırıcı; Zamanlayıcı/bitiş kapısı; Tünel; Diğer
hr-HR: Moduli značajki kompleta tobogana za pikule: Zvono/zvonce; Most/nadvožnjak; Kupola/sakupljač; Svijetleći / LED svjetlosni modul; Skok/rampa; Lanser/katapult; Petlja; Magnetski elementi; Ručno dizalo / lift; Motorizirano dizalo / lift; Klackalica / nagibni mehanizam; Zvučni modul; Kolovrat/rotor; Spiralni lijevak / vrtlog; Stepenice / kaskadna staza; Skretnica / preusmjerivač staze; Odbrojivač / ciljna vrata; Tunel; Ostalo
pl: Moduły funkcji zestawu toru kulkowego: Dzwonek / kuranty; Most / wiadukt; Kopuła / zbieracz; Moduł świetlny LED / fluorescencyjny; Skocznia / rampa; Wyrzutnia / katapulta; Pętla; Elementy magnetyczne; Ręczna winda / podnośnik; Winda z napędem / podnośnik; Huśtawka / pochylnia; Moduł dźwiękowy; Koło obrotowe / wirnik; Spirala / lejek; Schody / stopnie; Zwrotnica / rozdzielacz toru; Czasomierz / bramka mety; Tunel; Inne
zh-TW: 彈珠軌道組功能模組: 鐘/編鐘; 橋樑/天橋; 圓頂/收集器; 發光/LED 燈光模組; 跳台/坡道; 發射器/彈射器; 360 度迴旋; 磁性元素; 手動升降機/電梯; 電動升降機/電梯; 翹翹板/傾斜器; 聲音模組; 紡車/轉子; 螺旋漏斗/漩渦; 樓梯/階梯軌道; 開關/軌道轉轍器; 計時器/終點門; 隧道; 其他
ja: Marble追跡するセット機能Modules: ベル/チャイム; 橋/高架; ドーム/コレクター; 蓄光/LEDライトモジュール; ジャンプ/スロープ; ランチャー/カタパルト; ループ; マグネットパーツ; 手動エレベーター/リフト; 電動エレベーター/リフト; シーソー/ティルター; サウンドモジュール; スピニングホイール/ローター; スパイラルファンネル/ボルテックス; 階段/ステップトラック; スイッチ/ポイント切り替え; タイマー/フィニッシュゲート; トンネル; その他
ro-RO: Module de funcționalitate ale setului de piste pentru bile: Clopoțel; Pod/pasaj; Dom/colector; Modul fosforescent/lumină LED; Săritură/rampă; Lansator/catapultă; Buclă (loop); Elemente magnetice; Lift/elevator manual; Lift/elevator motorizat; Balansoar/înclinator; Modul de sunet; Roată care se învârte/rotor; Pâlnie spirală/vortex; Trepte/pistă cu trepte; Macaz/deviator de pistă; Cronometru/poartă de sosire; Tunel; Altele
pt-BR: Conjunto de pista de bolinhas módulos de recursos: Sino/carrilhão; Ponte/viaduto; Cúpula/coletor; Módulo de luz LED/brilho; Salto/rampa; Lançador/catapulta; Looping; Elementos magnéticos; Elevador manual; Elevador motorizado; Gangorra/inclinador; Módulo de som; Roda giratória/rotor; Funil em espiral/vórtice; Escadas/trilho de degraus; Interruptor/desviador de trilho; Temporizador/portão de chegada; Túnel; Outro
it: Moduli speciali del set pista per biglie: Campanella/carillon; Ponte/cavalcavia; Cupola/collettore; Modulo luminoso fosforescente/LED; Salto/rampa; Lanciatore/catapulta; Giro della morte; Elementi magnetici; Ascensore/montacarichi manuale; Ascensore/montacarichi motorizzato; Altalena/bilico; Modulo sonoro; Ruota che gira/rotore; Imbuto a spirale/vortice; Scale/pista a gradini; Scambio/deviatore di pista; Timer/traguardo; Tunnel; Altro
pt-PT: Conjunto de pistas de mármore com módulos: Sino/carrilhão; Ponte/viaduto; Cúpula/coletor; Módulo de brilho/luz LED; Salto/rampa; Lançador/catapulta; Looping; Elementos magnéticos; Elevador manual; Elevador motorizado; Baloiço/inclinador; Módulo de som; Roda giratória/rotor; Funil em espiral/vórtice; Escadas/pista em degraus; Interruptor/desviador de pista; Temporizador/porta de chegada; Túnel; Outro
en: Marble track set feature modules: Bell/chime; Bridge/overpass; Dome/collector; Glow/LED light module; Jump/ramp; Launcher/catapult; Loop-the-loop; Magnetic elements; Manual elevator/lift; Motorized elevator/lift; See-saw/tilter; Sound module; Spinning wheel/rotor; Spiral funnel/vortex; Stairs/step track; Switch/track diverter; Timer/finish gate; Tunnel; Other
ko: 구슬 굴리기 트랙 세트 기능 모듈: 종/차임벨; 다리/육교; 돔/수집기; 야광/LED 조명 모듈; 점프/경사로; 런처/투석기; 360도 회전 루프; 자석 요소; 수동 엘리베이터/리프트; 전동 엘리베이터/리프트; 시소/기울기 장치; 사운드 모듈; 물레방아/로터; 나선형 깔때기/소용돌이; 계단/스텝 트랙; 스위치/트랙 전환기; 타이머/도착 게이트; 터널; 기타
el: Χαρακτηριστικά στοιχεία πίστας για μπίλιες: Κουδούνι/καμπανάκι; Γέφυρα/διάβαση; Θόλος/συλλέκτης; Μονάδα φωτισμού λάμψης/LED; Άλμα/ράμπα; Εκτοξευτής/καταπέλτης; Λουπ; Μαγνητικά στοιχεία; Χειροκίνητος ανελκυστήρας; Μηχανοκίνητος ανελκυστήρας; Τραμπάλα/ανατροπέας; Μονάδα ήχου; Τροχός/ρότορας περιστροφής; Σπειροειδές χωνί/δίνη; Σκαλοπάτια/σκαλωτή πίστα; Διακόπτης/εκτροπέας πίστας; Χρονόμετρο/πύλη τερματισμού; Τούνελ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Moduly a funkčné prvky súpravy guľôčkovej dráhy: Zvonček/zvonkohra; Most/nadchod; Kupola/zberač; Svietiaci/LED svetelný modul; Skok/rampa; Odpaľovač/katapult; Loping; Magnetické prvky; Manuálny výťah; Motorizovaný výťah; Hojdačka/sklopná doska; Zvukový modul; Kolovrátok/rotor; Špirálový lievik / vír; Schody/stupňovitá dráha; Výhybka; Časovač / cieľová brána; Tunel; Iné
fi: Kuularatasetin ominaisuusmoduulit: Kello/kulkunen; Silta/ylikulku; Kupoli/kerääjä; Hohto-/LED-valomoduuli; Hyppyri/ramppi; Laukaisin/katapultti; Silmukka; Magneettiset osat; Manuaalinen hissi/nostin; Moottoroitu hissi/nostin; Keinulauta/kallistaja; Äänimoduuli; Pyörivä pyörä / roottori; Spiraalisuppilo/pyörre; Portaat/askelmarata; Vaihde / radan jakaja; Ajastin/maaliportti; Tunneli; Muu
sv: Set för marmorbana – funktionsmoduler: Klocka/spel; Bro/viadukt; Kupol/samlare; Lysande/LED-ljusmodul; Hopp/ramp; Avskjutare/katapult; Looping; Magnetiska element; Manuell hiss/lyft; Motoriserad hiss/lyft; Gungbräda/vipp; Ljudmodul; Snurrande hjul/rotor; Spiraltrakt/virvel; Trappa/stegbana; Växel/banskiljare; Tidtagare/målgrind; Tunnel; Annat
lt-LT: Rutuliukų trasos rinkinio funkcijų moduliai: Varpelis / varpas; Tiltas / viadukas; Kupolas / rinktuvas; Švytintis / LED šviesos modulis; Šuolis / rampa; Paleidiklis / katapulta; Mirties kilpa; Magnetiniai elementai; Rankinis liftas / keltuvas; Motorizuotas liftas / keltuvas; Sūpuoklės / pakreipėjas; Garso modulis; Besisukantis ratas / rotorius; Spiralinis piltuvas / sūkurys; Laiptai / laiptuota trasa; Jungiklis / trasos nukreipiklis; Laikmatis / finišo vartai; Tunelis; Kita
da: Funktionsmoduler til kuglebanesæt: Klokke/kimeklokke; Bro/overføring; Kuppel/opsamler; Selvlysende/LED-lysmodul; Hop/rampe; Affyrer/katapult; Loop; Magnetiske elementer; Manuel elevator/lift; Motoriseret elevator/lift; Vippe; Lydmodul; Spindehjul/rotor; Spiraltragt/vortex; Trapper/trinbane; Sporskifte; Timer/målport; Tunnel; Andet
zh-CN: 滚珠轨道套装功能模块: 铃铛/风铃; 桥梁/天桥; 圆顶/收集器; 发光/LED 灯模块; 跳跃/斜坡; 发射器/弹射器; 环形轨道; 磁性元件; 手动升降机/电梯; 电动升降机/电梯; 跷跷板/倾斜器; 声音模块; 旋转轮/转子; 螺旋漏斗/漩涡; 楼梯/阶梯轨道; 开关/轨道分流器; 计时器/终点门; 隧道; 其他
hu: Golyópályakészlet funkciómoduljai: Csengő/harangjáték; Híd/felüljáró; Kupola/gyűjtő; Világító/LED fénymodul; Ugrató/rámpa; Indító/katapult; Hurok; Mágneses elemek; Kézi felvonó/lift; Motoros felvonó/lift; Mérleghinta/billentő; Hangmodul; Forgókerék/rotor; Spirális tölcsér/örvény; Lépcső/lépcsős pálya; Váltó/pályaelágazás; Időzítő/célkapu; Alagút; Egyéb
nb: Kulebanesettets funksjons-/modulkomponenter: Bjelle; Bro/overgang; Kuppel/oppsamler; Selvlysende / LED-lys-modul; Hopp/rampe; Utskyter/katapult; Loop; Magnetiske elementer; Manuell heis/heis; Motorisert heis/heis; Vippe/vippebrett; Lydmodul; Spinnende hjul / rotor; Spiraltrakt/virvel; Trapper/trinnspor; Bryter/sporskifter; Tidtaker/målport; Tunnel; Annet